Hawaii statutes.
§174-20 Furnishing domestic water. In
conjunction with any project which it has established, and subject to pertinent
provisions of law governing the supply, the board of land and natural resources
may establish a system for and supply water for domestic purposes to residents
within and in close proximity to the project. The system shall be established
only if (1) the board determines that it would be advisable and in the public
interest to provide the domestic supply; (2) its construction and operation by
the board has been consented to by the board of water supply of the county in
which the project is situated, and by a majority of the land occupiers within
the project; and (3) if under normal conditions of water availability, the
operation of the system will not prejudice or interfere with the supply of
water to the land occupiers within the project. The board may also subject to
the limitations previously set forth in this section, take over, improve, and
operate any existing system for the supply of domestic water if requested so to
do by the owners and operators of the system. [L 1961, c 166, pt of §3; am L
1963, c 193, §27; Supp, §86-19; HRS §174-20; am L 1987, c 306, §13]

Case Notes

Contract in which board rented excess transmission capacity in
Molokai irrigation system without consent of homesteaders does not violate this
section. 62 H. 546, 617 P.2d 1208.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next